North Carolina, session 2025, HB319.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management in the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Hispanic Grassroots to assist
the organization providing its education outreach services to the Hispanic population in North
Carolina.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H319-v-1*